District of Columbia statutes.
21-305

Transfer authorized by will or trust.

(a)

A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer pursuant to section 21-309 to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust, subject to the authority of the court under section 20-1106.

(b)

If the testator or the settlor has nominated a custodian under section 21-303 to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

(c)

If the testator or the settlor has not nominated a custodian under section 21-303 or if all persons so nominated die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee shall designate a custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under section 21-309(a).

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278

History

This section is referenced in § 21-307, § 21-309, and § 21-320.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 21-305.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

Editor's Notes